Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-606
Participant; owner duties; warning notice; contents.

(1) Nothing in section 82-604 limits any liability of an owner who receives a fee for allowing a participant on the premises if the owner fails to do at least one of the following:

(a) Post and maintain signage containing the warning as described in subsection (2) of this section in a clearly visible and conspicuous location at or near the entrance to the property used for agritourism activities; or

(b) Include the warning as described in subsection (2) of this section in any written contract between the owner of the property and each participant allowed on the premises for a fee. Such warning shall be in a conspicuous location within the contract and be written in not less than twelve-point boldface type.

(2) The warning notice shall read as follows: WARNING - Under Nebraska law, an owner of property, including lands and waters, is not liable for the injury to or death of the participant in agritourism activities or damage to the participant's property resulting from the inherent risks of such activities. Inherent risks include, without limitation, the risk of animals and land and water conditions, the ordinary dangers of structures or equipment ordinarily used in farming or ranching operations, and the potential for you or another participant to act in a negligent manner that may contribute to your own injury or death. You are assuming the risk of participating in the agritourism activities for which you are entering the owner's premises.

Laws 2015, LB329, § 6.